Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 652.310 to
652.414.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) If the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries receives
a valid wage claim filed against a contractor or a business  subject to licensing under ORS
chapter 701  for unpaid wages, the commissioner shall notify the Construction Contractors
Board and the contractor or the business of the claim within  30 days of the commissioner’s
receipt of the claim.
(b) If wages are found due and the contractor or business fails to  pay the unpaid wages
upon demand, the commissioner shall serve upon the contractor or business an order of  de-
termination as prescribed under ORS 652.332.
(2)(a) If an order issued under ORS 652.332 for the payment  of a wage claim described
under subsection (1)  of this section becomes final, the commissioner shall notify the board
of the final order.
(b) The commissioner shall notify  the board if the contractor or business fails to pay the
amounts due pursuant to the final order within 60 days of the  date of the order, unless a
motion to stay the order is pending or has been granted by the commissioner  under ORS
183.482.
(3) As used in this section, “contractor” has the meaning  given that term in ORS 701.005.
SECTION 3.  ORS 652.332 is amended to read:
652.332. (1) In any  case when the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries has re-
ceived a wage claim complaint which  the commissioner could seek to collect through court action,
the commissioner may instead elect to seek collection of such claim through  administrative pro-
ceedings in the manner provided  in this section, subject to the employer’s right to request a trial
in a court of law. The commissioner may join in a single administrative proceeding any  number of
wage claims against the same employer. Upon making such election, the commissioner shall serve
upon the employer and the wage claimant an order of  determination directing the employer to pay
to the commissioner the amount of the wage claim and any penalty amounts under ORS 279C.855
(1), 652.150 and 653.055 (1) determined to be owed the wage  claimant. Service shall be made in the
same manner as service of summons or by certified mail, return receipt requested. The order of  de-
termination shall include:
(a) A reference to the particular sections of the statutes or rules involved;
Enrolled House Bill 3193 (HB 3193-B) Page 1
(b) A short and concise statement of the basis for the amounts determined to be owed  to each
wage claimant;
(c) A statement  of the party’s right to request a contested case hearing and to be represented
by counsel at such a hearing, and of the employer’s right to a trial in a  court of law, provided that
any request for a contested case hearing or trial in a court of law must be received by  the com-
missioner in writing within 20 days after receipt by the party of the order of determination;
(d) A statement that the employer must, within  20 days after receipt of the order of determi-
nation, either pay in  full the wage claim and any penalties assessed, or present to the commissioner
a written request for a contested case hearing or a trial in a court of law as provided in this section;
(e) A statement that failure to make  a written request to the commissioner for a contested case
hearing or a trial of the claim in a court of law within the time specified  shall constitute a waiver
of the right thereto and a waiver of the right to a trial by jury; [ and]
(f) For an employer that is a contractor or business  licensed under ORS chapter 701, a
statement that failure to pay in  full the wage claim and any penalties assessed within 60 days
of the date that an order of determination becomes final  under this section will result in
notification to  the Construction Contractors Board of such failure to pay and the suspension
of the contractor’s or business’s license in accordance with section 11 of this 2019 Act; and
[(f)] (g) A statement that unless the written requests provided for in paragraph (c) of this  sub-
section are received by the commissioner within the  time specified for making such requests, the
order of determination shall become final.
(2) Upon failure of the employer to pay the amount specified in  the order of determination or
to request a trial in a court of law within the time specified,  and upon failure of any party to re-
quest a contested case hearing within the time specified, the order of determination shall become
final.
(3) If a  party makes a timely request for a contested case hearing, a hearing shall be held in
accordance with the applicable provisions of  ORS 183.415 to 183.500 by the commissioner or the
commissioner’s designee. The commissioner shall adopt rules for  such hearing. In any hearing before
the commissioner’s designee, the designee is  authorized to issue the final order in the case. If the
employer makes a timely request for a trial in  a court of law, the commissioner may proceed against
the employer as provided in ORS 652.330 (1)(b).
(4) Final administrative orders issued in a wage claim proceeding are subject to  review by the
Court of Appeals as provided in ORS 183.480 and 183.482.
(5) When an order issued under this section becomes final, it  may be recorded in the County
Clerk Lien Record in any county of this state. In addition  to any other remedy provided by law,
recording an order in the County Clerk  Lien Record pursuant to the provisions of this section has
the effect provided for in ORS 205.125 and 205.126, and the order may be  enforced as provided in
ORS 205.125 and 205.126.
(6) Where the wage claim arose  out of work performed by the claimant for the employer on any
public works project to which ORS 279C.830 or 279C.840 applies, and a state agency holds sufficient
funds as retainage on such project to pay such claim or any portion thereof, the state  agency may,
at the request of the commissioner, pay to the commissioner from  the retainage all or part of the
amount due on the claim under the final order.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 652.414 is amended to read:
652.414. Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(1) When an employee files  a wage claim under this chapter for wages earned and unpaid, and
the Commissioner of the Bureau of  Labor and Industries determines that the employer against whom
the claim was  filed has ceased doing business and is without sufficient assets to pay the wage claim
and the wage claim cannot otherwise  be fully and promptly paid, the commissioner, after determin-
ing that the claim is valid, shall pay the claimant,  to the extent provided in subsection (2) of this
section:
(a) The  unpaid amount of wages earned within 60 days before the date of the cessation of busi-
ness; or
Enrolled House Bill 3193 (HB 3193-B) Page 2
(b) If the  claimant filed a wage claim before the cessation of business, the unpaid amount of
wages earned within 60 days before the last day the claimant was employed.
(2) The commissioner shall pay the unpaid amount of wages earned as provided  in subsection (1)
of this section only to the extent of [ $4,000] $10,000 from such funds as may  be available pursuant
to ORS 652.409 (2).
(3) The commissioner may commence an appropriate action,  suit or proceeding to recover from
the employer, or other persons or property liable for the unpaid  wages, amounts paid from the Wage
Security Fund under subsection (1) of this section. In addition to costs and disbursements, the com-
missioner is entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees at  trial and on appeal, together with a
penalty of 25 percent of the amount  of wages paid from the Wage Security Fund or $200, whichever
amount is the greater. All  amounts recovered by the commissioner under this subsection and sub-
section (4) of  this section are appropriated continuously to the commissioner to carry out the pro-
visions of this section.
(4) The commissioner has a lien on the personal property of the employer for the benefit of  the
fund when the claim is paid under subsection (1) of this section for the amount  so paid and the
penalty referred to in subsection (3) of this section. The  commissioner may cause to be filed a ver-
ified written notice of claim of lien with the  recording officer of the county in which the employer
has its principal place of business  no later than 30 days after the date the claim was paid under
subsection (1) of this section. The notice of claim of lien shall contain:
(a) A true statement of the sums paid to wage claimants and the  amount of the penalty provided
for in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) The name of the owner of the personal property to be charged with the lien;
(c) A description of the personal property to  be charged with the lien sufficient for identifica-
tion. If a lien is  being claimed against all personal property of the employer, the description is suf-
ficient if it states that all personal property of the employer is covered; and
(d) The date the wage claim was paid.
(5) Liens created by subsection (4) of this section shall be recorded in  the same manner as
provided for in ORS 87.246 and may be foreclosed in the manner provided for in ORS 87.262.
(6) Liens created by subsection (4) of this section shall have  priority over any other liens or
security interests perfected after the date the notice of  claim is filed with the county recording of-
ficer under subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(7) The commissioner shall promulgate rules to  carry out the provisions of this section that in-
clude, but are not limited to, prescribing procedures for a timely and cost efficient method for  the
payment of wage claims from the Wage Security Fund and  procedures for prorating wage claims if
insufficient funds are available for payment.
(8) Nothing in this section is intended to require  the commissioner to pay wage claims for which
moneys are not available under ORS 652.409 (2).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 701.102 is amended to read:
701.102. (1) As used in this section, “construction contractor license”  means a license issued
within the United States to engage in the business of construction contracting.
(2) The Construction  Contractors Board may revoke, suspend or refuse to issue a license re-
quired under this chapter to a business if:
(a) The business owes a construction debt or  has had a construction contractor license revoked
or suspended;
(b) An owner, officer or responsible managing individual of the business owes a  construction
debt or has had a construction contractor license revoked or suspended;
(c) An owner, officer or  responsible managing individual of the business was an owner, officer
or responsible managing individual of  another business at the time the other business incurred a
construction debt that is owing or at the time of an event that resulted in the  revocation or sus-
pension of the other business’s construction contractor license; or
(d) The board determines that an owner, officer or responsible managing  individual of the busi-
ness is not  fit for licensure, based upon information submitted to the board under ORS 701.046,
Enrolled House Bill 3193 (HB 3193-B) Page 3
submitted in a registration of securities described in ORS  701.046 (2) or discovered by a board in-
vestigation under ORS 701.225.
(3) The board may place a contractor on probation if a total of three or more  complaints are
filed with the board  under ORS 701.139 within a 12-month period against the contractor or a former
licensed  construction  contracting business in which the contractor held at least a 10 percent own-
ership interest, measured as determined by board rule. A contractor may not  be placed on probation
unless the  board determines after investigation that it is likely that the contractor has caused harm
to the complainants. The board may require  a contractor that is placed on probation to develop a
corrective action plan, to attend specific classes and to resolve outstanding complaints.  The board
may require a contractor that is placed  on probation to take training and pass a test, both as de-
scribed in ORS 701.122. The board shall take action to terminate the contractor’s license if  the
contractor is unwilling or unable to comply with the conditions of probation.
(4) The board may use the notification of a final order received under section 2 of  this
2019 Act for purposes of determining whether to:
(a) Revoke, suspend or refuse to issue a license to  a business or an owner, officer or
responsible managing individual of the business that failed to  pay the amounts due pursuant
to the final order;
(b) Notwithstanding the conditions specified for probation  in subsection (3) of this sec-
tion, place a contractor on probation as provided in subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) Require a contractor to  pay a higher amount to obtain a surety bond as required by
a board condition or rule under ORS 701.068 (5) or (6).
SECTION 6.  ORS 701.133 is amended to read:
701.133. (1) Unless otherwise provided by the Construction Contractors Board by  rule, before
filing a complaint under  ORS 701.139, a person must send notice to the contractor that the person
intends to file the complaint. The  person must send the notice at least 30 days before filing the
complaint. The notice must be mailed by certified mail to the last  known address of the contractor
as shown in board records. The board by rule may:
(a) Specify the manner in  which the person may show compliance with this subsection at the
time of filing the complaint.
(b) Provide that all or part of the requirements  for sending a notice under this subsection may
be waived if  the contractor, by other means, has actual notice of the dispute with the person filing
the complaint.
(2) If the notice described in subsection (1) of this section  is mailed to the contractor fewer than
45 days before expiration of the  time limitation under ORS 701.143 for the board to receive the
complaint, the time limitation for the board to receive the complaint does not expire until  60 days
after the notice is mailed.
(3) The board by rule may impose a processing fee for complaints filed under ORS  701.139. The
fee amount may not exceed $100. The  board may impose different processing fees for complaints
processed under ORS 701.145 than for complaints processed under ORS 701.146.
(4) If the board adopts rules under subsection (3) of this section, the rules:
(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, must provide that a prevail-
ing complainant recover processing fees.
(b) Must provide that the board may waive or defer all or part  of the processing fee upon ap-
plication by the person filing the complaint that shows the person is unable to pay all  or part of the
fee. The application must be made under oath and notarized. The application must show the average
monthly income and expenses of the complainant, assets and liabilities of the  complainant and any
other information required by board rule.
(c) May provide for the processing fee to be  waived for all complaints that are based on the
furnishing of labor by a complainant to a contractor. The board may provide for processing fee
waiver under this paragraph only if, in the opinion of the board, a majority  of complainants who file
complaints based on the furnishing of labor to contractors are eligible  for fee waivers as described
in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 3193 (HB 3193-B) Page 4
(5) Notice of a valid wage claim received under section 2 of this 2019 Act  satisfies the
notice of intent to file a complaint required by subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 7.  ORS 701.143 is amended to read:
701.143. The Construction Contractors Board may not process a complaint against a licensed
contractor, including a complaint based upon a  court judgment or an arbitration award, unless the
complaint is filed with the board in a timely manner as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the  owner of a new structure files the com-
plaint, the board must receive the complaint no later than the earlier of:
(a) One year after the date the structure was first occupied; or
(b) Two years after substantial completion of the structure by the contractor filed against.
(2) Except as  otherwise provided in this section, if the owner of an existing structure files the
complaint, the board must receive the complaint no later than one year after the date the work was
substantially completed by the contractor filed against.
(3) Regardless of whether the complaint involves a new or an existing structure,  if the owner
of the structure files the complaint and the licensed contractor failed  to begin the work, the board
must receive  the complaint no later than one year after the date the parties entered into the con-
tract.
(4) Regardless of whether  the complaint involves a new or an existing structure, if the owner
of the structure files the  complaint and the licensed contractor failed to substantially complete the
work, the board must receive the complaint no later  than one year after the date the contractor
ceased to work on the structure.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a licensed contractor files the complaint
against the licensed contractor performing work as a subcontractor on a new structure, the  board
must receive the complaint no later than the earlier of:
(a) Fourteen months after the date the structure was first occupied; or
(b) Two years after substantial completion of the structure.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a licensed contractor files the complaint
against the licensed contractor  performing work as a subcontractor on an existing structure, the
board must receive the complaint no later than 14 months after the date the work on  the structure
was substantially completed.
(7) If a licensed contractor files  the complaint against the licensed contractor performing work
as a subcontractor on a  structure and the subcontractor failed to substantially complete the work,
the board must receive the  complaint no later than 14 months after the date the subcontractor
ceased to work on the structure.
(8) If the licensed contractor’s employee, subcontractor or material or  equipment supplier files
the complaint, the board must receive the  complaint no later than one year after the date the con-
tractor incurred the indebtedness.
(9) The filing of a complaint  with the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Indus-
tries for unpaid wages  constitutes the filing of a complaint for purposes of establishing
timeliness of the filing of a complaint under this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 701.146 is amended to read:
701.146. For a complaint described in ORS 701.139 (2)  or (3)(c) or a complaint under ORS 701.139
(3)(b) that a complainant elects to have resolved under this section:
(1) The person seeking to file the complaint with the Construction Contractors Board must:
(a) Bring an action on  the dispute against the licensed contractor in a court of competent ju-
risdiction; or
(b) Initiate a proceeding to resolve the dispute through  binding arbitration substantially in
conformance with ORS 36.600 to 36.740.
(2) The complainant must file  the complaint with the Construction Contractors Board by deliv-
ering to the board a copy of the complainant’s court pleading or  the demand for arbitration or other
document necessary to initiate arbitration. The  pleading, demand or other document must be ac-
companied by a completed board  complaint form. The complainant must also give notice to the
Enrolled House Bill 3193 (HB 3193-B) Page 5
surety on the bond by delivering to  the surety a copy of the complainant’s court pleading or the
demand for arbitration or other document necessary to initiate arbitration and a  copy of the com-
pleted board complaint form. Delivery to the board and  the surety must be accomplished by certified
mail, return receipt requested, no later than the earlier of:
(a) The 90th day after filing the court action  or after filing or making the arbitration demand
or other initiation of arbitration;
(b) The 14th day before the first day of trial or arbitration; or
(c) The 30th day before:
(A) The court issues a judgment in the action; or
(B) The arbitrator issues an award on the arbitration.
(3) Filing the complaint  with the board under subsection (2) of this section constitutes filing the
complaint for purposes of establishing timeliness of the complaint under ORS 701.143 and priority
of the complaint for possible payment from the bond under ORS 701.157.
(4) Except as provided in this  subsection and subsection [ (7)] (8) of this section, if the
complainant properly gives notice  to the surety under subsection (2) of this section, a judgment or
award against the contractor entered in  the action or arbitration is binding on the surety. If the
complainant delivers the notice required under subsection (2) of this section to the  wrong surety,
the surety receiving the notice may avoid being  bound by a judgment or award by delivering notice
of the mistake to the complainant or the complainant’s attorney of  record, and to the board, on or
before the 30th day after the surety receives notice under subsection (2)  of this section. Delivery
of the notice of mistake must  be by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by facsimile machine
or other form of transmission with an acknowledgment of receipt.
(5) A surety under subsection (2) of this section has an absolute right to intervene  in an action
or arbitration brought or initiated  under subsection (1) of this section. A complainant may not join
a surety as a  party to an action or arbitration unless the complainant disputes the validity or
timeliness of the surety’s notice of  mistake or the surety disputes the validity or timeliness of the
delivery to the surety of the notice required by subsection (2)  of this section. If the surety elects to
intervene or is joined as a party, the surety is bound by all issues of fact  and law determined by the
court or arbitrator and may not seek board review of those determinations.
(6) If a court  issues a judgment on an action, or reduces an arbitration award to judgment,
against a contractor on a complaint described in subsection  (1) of this section, the complainant must
deliver a certified copy of the judgment to the board and to the surety no later than the 30th  day
after entry of the judgment in order to maintain the  complaint and possibly receive payment from
the bond. The entry of a final  judgment against the contractor concludes the contractor’s involve-
ment in any proceedings to determine whether the complaint is subject to payment from the bond.
The complainant and the surety are  the only parties to the administrative process set forth in sub-
section [ (7)] (8) of this section.
(7) If a complaint  is filed under ORS 701.140 (4), the complainant may recover payment
from the bond of the contractor as provided in  subsection (4) or (8) of this section or by
obtaining a final order issued by the Bureau  of Labor and Industries that states an amount
of unpaid wages that the licensed contractor owes to the wage claimant.
[(7)] (8) Upon receipt of a timely delivered  certified copy of the judgment as described in sub-
section (6) of this section,  the board shall issue a determination that the surety must pay the amount
stated by the board. The  determination issued by the board is an order in other than a contested
case proceeding.  The determination shall include the amount of the judgment together with any
costs, interest and attorney fees awarded  under the judgment, to the extent that the judgment, costs,
interest and fees are within  the jurisdiction of the board. The board’s determination of the complaint
is limited to whether the complaint comes within  the jurisdiction of the board and is subject to
payment by the surety.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 701.153 is amended to read:
701.153. (1) If an order of the Construction Contractors Board determines a  complaint against
a residential contractor that was filed with the board  prior to July 1, 2011, and the order becomes
Enrolled House Bill 3193 (HB 3193-B) Page 6
final by operation of law or on  appeal and remains unpaid 10 days after the date the order becomes
final, the complainant may file the order with the county clerk in any county of this state.
(2) Upon receipt of an order described in subsection (1) of this section, the  clerk shall record
the order in the County Clerk Lien Record. In addition to any other remedy provided by law, re-
cording an order described in subsection (1) of this section in the County Clerk Lien  Record pur-
suant to the provisions of this section has the effect provided for in ORS 205.125 and  205.126, and
the order may be enforced as provided in ORS 205.125 and 205.126.
(3)(a) Payments from the surety bond of a residential contractor pursuant to a board determi-
nation under ORS 701.145 are satisfied in the following priority in any 90-day period:
(A) Board determinations as a result  of complaints against a residential contractor by the owner
of a residential or small commercial structure have  payment priority to the full extent of the bond
over all other types of complaints.
(B) If the determinations described in subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph do not exhaust the
bond, then amounts due under board determinations for all other types  of residential or small com-
mercial structure complaints filed  with the board within that 90-day period may be paid from the
bond, except that the total  amount paid from any one bond to nonowner complainants may not ex-
ceed  $3,000.
(b) A 90-day  period begins on the date the first complaint is filed with the board. Subsequent
90-day periods begin on the date the first complaint is filed with the board after  the close of the
preceding 90-day period.
(4) If the total amount payable under determinations issued by  the board for complaints against
a residential contractor filed with the board within 90 days  after the board receives notice of the
first complaint against the contractor exceed the amount  of the bond available for payment, subject
to the priorities under this section, the board shall decide how payment of the  determined amounts
from the bond is to be apportioned.
(5) If the total amount payable under determinations issued by the board as a result  of com-
plaints that were  filed with the board within 90 days after the board receives notice of the first
complaint do not exceed the  amount of the bond available for payment, those determinations have
payment priority over amounts due under determinations resulting from subsequently  filed com-
plaints.
(6) The total amount paid from a residential contractor bond for  costs and interest under all
determinations issued by the board under ORS 701.145 may not exceed $3,000.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section, if the board  determines that
the bond required is a higher amount than the amount required ordinarily of a licensee  to
file a bond under ORS 701.081, the  $3,000 limit payable from the bond for a nonowner com-
plaint under subsection (3)(a)(B)  of this section shall be increased in an amount that is pro-
portional to  the increased amount required to file the bond, as determined by the board
under ORS 701.068 (5) or (6).
(b) If a complaint filed under ORS 701.140 (4) or a notice received under section  2 of this
2019 Act contributes to the board’s determination under  ORS 701.068 (5) or (6) that a licensee
must file a bond in an amount that is higher than the amount  required ordinarily of a
licensee, the total amount available for payment of nonowner  complaints shall be $3,000 plus
up to 50  percent of the amount of the bond as required by the board that exceeds the bond
amount ordinarily required under ORS 701.081 or 701.084.
SECTION 10.
Section 11 of  this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 701.
SECTION 11. Upon receipt of the notification provided by the Commissioner of  the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries under section 2 of this 2019 Act stating  that a contractor or a
business has failed to pay the amounts  due as ordered in a final determination order within
60 days of the issuance of the  order, the Construction Contractors Board shall, after notice
and opportunity for a hearing  under ORS chapter 183, suspend the license of the contractor
or the business.
Enrolled House Bill 3193 (HB 3193-B) Page 7
SECTION 12. The amendments to ORS 652.332 by section 3 of this 2019 Act apply to wages
owed for labor performed on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
Passed by House April 4, 2019
Repassed by House June 11, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 23, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3193 (HB 3193-B) Page 8